Hawaii statutes.
§660-23 Evading service, penalties.
The liabilities and penalties of section 660-22 shall also be imposed upon any
person who, having in that person's custody or under that person's power any
person entitled to a writ of habeas corpus, with intent to elude the service of
the writ or to avoid the effect thereof, transfers the person to the custody or
places the person under the control or power of any other person, or conceals
the person or changes the person's place of confinement. [L 1870, c 32, §27; RL
1925, §2746; RL 1935, §4331; RL 1945, §10372; RL 1955, §239-23; HRS §660-23; am
L 2016, c 55, §39]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next